Vermont, session 2025-2026, H280.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. ASSESSMENT OF THE FEASIBILITY OF SITING AN
EXPANDED POLYSTYRENE FOAM DENSIFIER IN THE STATE
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “EPS foam densifier” means a machine that shears, compresses, and
heats waste EPS foam into a uniform melt that can be formed into blocks or
other shapes for transport and ultimate reuse.
VT LEG #379375 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.280
2025 Page 2 of 3
(2) “Expanded polystyrene foam” or “EPS foam” means a thermoplastic
petrochemical material utilizing the styrene monomer that is processed
according to multiple techniques, including fusion of polymer spheres,
injection molding, form molding, and extrusion-blow molding.
(b) The Secretary of Natural Resources shall assess the feasibility of siting
an EPS foam densifier in the State to serve as a site to transport waste EPS
foam for recycling or reuse. The Secretary shall coordinate with interested
parties in conducting the assessment, including solid waste management
entities, solid waste haulers, and representative of businesses that generate
waste EPS foam through manufacturing or shipping. On or before January 15,
2026, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall submit to the House Committee
on Environment and Energy and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources
and Energy a report with the results of the site assessment. The report shall
include:
(1) a recommendation of whether an EPS foam densifier should be sited
in Vermont, where it should be sited, and what entity would run the densifier;
(2) an estimate of the cost of the EPS foam densifier to purchase and
operate;
(3) a recommendation of whether EPS foam should be banned from
landfill disposal if an EPS foam densifier is located in the State; and
VT LEG #379375 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.280
2025 Page 3 of 3
(4) a proposal of how solid waste haulers, businesses, and the public
would access an EPS foam densifier for disposition of waste EPS foam.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379375 v.1